ispell.cs/cs_affix.dat
SET UTF-8
TRY aAáÁäÄąĄâÂăĂbBcCčČćĆçÇdDďĎđĐeEéÉěĚëËęĘfFgGhHiIíÍîÎjJkKlLĺĹľĽłŁmMnNňŇńŃoOóÓôÔöÖőŐpPqQrRřŘŕŔsSšŠśŚşŞtTťŤţŢuUúÚůŮüÜűŰvVwWxXyYýÝzZžŽźŹżŻß

PFX N Y 1
PFX N 0 ne .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 nej .

PFX W Y 3
PFX W 0 ne .
PFX W 0 nej .
PFX W 0 nejne .

PFX F Y 11
PFX F 0 jedena .
PFX F 0 jedna .
PFX F 0 dvaa .
PFX F 0 třia .
PFX F 0 čtyřia .
PFX F 0 čtyrya .
PFX F 0 pěta .
PFX F 0 šesta .
PFX F 0 sedma .
PFX F 0 osma .
PFX F 0 devěta .

SFX P Y 124
SFX P 0 a [^aeokl]
SFX P 0 u [^aeoklu]
SFX P 0 ovi [^aeokl]
SFX P 0 e [^aeoklurcgh]
SFX P 0 e [aeiouyáéíóúůýěAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚŮÝĚ]r
SFX P r ře [^aeiouyáéíóúůýěAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚŮÝĚ]r
SFX P 0 em [^aeokl]
SFX P 0 ů [^aeokl]
SFX P 0 ům [^aeokl]
SFX P 0 y [^aeokl]
SFX P 0 ech [^aeoklghu]
SFX P g zích g
SFX P h zích [^cC]h
SFX P ch ších ch
SFX P 0 ích u
SFX P 0 a [^eěEĚ]k
SFX P 0 u [^eěEĚ]k
SFX P 0 ovi [^eěEĚ]k
SFX P 0 em [^eěEĚ]k
SFX P 0 ů [^eěEĚ]k
SFX P 0 ům [^eěEĚ]k
SFX P k cích [^eěEĚ]k
SFX P 0 y [^eěEĚ]k
SFX P ek ka ek
SFX P ek ku ek
SFX P ek kovi ek
SFX P ek kem ek
SFX P ek ků ek
SFX P ek kům ek
SFX P ek cích ek
SFX P ek ky ek
SFX P 0 a [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX P 0 u [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX P 0 ovi [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX P 0 em [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX P 0 ků [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX P 0 kům [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX P 0 cích [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX P 0 ky [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX P děk ďka děk
SFX P děk ďku děk
SFX P děk ďkovi děk
SFX P děk ďkem děk
SFX P děk ďků děk
SFX P děk ďkům děk
SFX P děk ďcích děk
SFX P děk ďky děk
SFX P něk ňka něk
SFX P něk ňku něk
SFX P něk ňkovi něk
SFX P něk ňkem něk
SFX P něk ňků něk
SFX P něk ňkům něk
SFX P něk ňcích něk
SFX P něk ňky něk
SFX P těk ťka těk
SFX P těk ťku těk
SFX P těk ťkovi těk
SFX P těk ťkem těk
SFX P těk ťků těk
SFX P těk ťkům těk
SFX P těk ťcích těk
SFX P těk ťky těk
SFX P 0 a [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P 0 u [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P 0 ovi [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P 0 e [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P 0 em [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P 0 ů [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P 0 ům [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P 0 y [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P 0 ech [abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX P el la [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el lu [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el lovi [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el le [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el li [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el lem [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el lů [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el lům [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el ly [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P el lech [^abdtšžiouABDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX P 0 a [^eE]l
SFX P 0 u [^eE]l
SFX P 0 ovi [^eE]l
SFX P 0 e [^eE]l
SFX P 0 em [^eE]l
SFX P 0 ů [^eE]l
SFX P 0 ům [^eE]l
SFX P 0 y [^eE]l
SFX P 0 ech [^eE]l
SFX P o a o
SFX P o u o
SFX P o ovi o
SFX P o em o
SFX P o ů o
SFX P o ům o
SFX P o y o
SFX P o ech [^gkGK]o
SFX P o ách [gkGK]o
SFX P a y [^cčďijňřšťžCČĎIJŇŘŠŤŽ]a
SFX P a i [cčijřšžCČIJŘŠŽ]a
SFX P ďa di ďa
SFX P ňa ni ňa
SFX P ťa ti ťa
SFX P a ovi a
SFX P a u a
SFX P a o a
SFX P a ou a
SFX P a ů a
SFX P a ům a
SFX P a ech [^kďňťhKĎŇŤH]a
SFX P ka cích ka
SFX P ďa děch ďa
SFX P ňa něch ňa
SFX P ťa těch ťa
SFX P e a e
SFX P e u e
SFX P e ovi e
SFX P 0 m e
SFX P e ů e
SFX P e ům e
SFX P e y e
SFX P 0 ch e

SFX I Y 18
SFX I ď di ď
SFX I ň ni ň
SFX I ť ti ť
SFX I h zi [^cC]h
SFX I ch ši ch
SFX I r ři r
SFX I 0 i [bdfmnptvwcčjřsšzž]
SFX I o i o
SFX I el li [^bdtšžiouBDTŠŽIOU]el
SFX I 0 i [bdtšžiouBDTŠŽIOU][eE]l
SFX I 0 i [^eE]l
SFX I k ci [^eěEĚ]k
SFX I ek ci ek
SFX I děk ďci děk
SFX I něk ňci něk
SFX I těk ťci těk
SFX I re ři re
SFX I a i a

SFX V Y 17
SFX V 0 ové [^aekloň]
SFX V a ové a
SFX V e ové e
SFX V 0 ové [^aeiouyáéíóúýěAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚÝĚ][^bdaeiouyáéíóúýěBDAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚÝĚ][eE]l
SFX V el lové [aeiouyáéíóúýěAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚÝĚ][^bdaeiouyáéíóúýěBDAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚÝĚ]el
SFX V 0 ové [bdaeiouyáéíóúýěBDAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚÝĚ][eE]l
SFX V 0 ové [^eE]l
SFX V 0 ové [^dtnDTN][ěĚ]k
SFX V děk ďkové děk
SFX V něk ňkové něk
SFX V těk ťkové těk
SFX V 0 vé o
SFX V 0 ové [^eěEĚ]k
SFX V ek kové ek
SFX V 0 ové [lL][eE]ň
SFX V eň ňové [^lL]eň
SFX V 0 ové [^eE]ň

SFX U Y 61
SFX U ec ce ec
SFX U ec ci ec
SFX U ec če ec
SFX U ec cem ec
SFX U ec ců ec
SFX U ec cům ec
SFX U ec cích ec
SFX U 0 e [^eE]c
SFX U 0 i [^eE]c
SFX U 0 em [^eE]c
SFX U 0 ů [^eE]c
SFX U 0 ům [^eE]c
SFX U 0 ích [^eE]c
SFX U 0 e [^acďeňť]
SFX U 0 i [^acďeňťi]
SFX U 0 ovi [^acďeňť]
SFX U 0 em [^acďeňť]
SFX U 0 ů [^aceň]
SFX U 0 ům [^aceň]
SFX U 0 ích [^acďeňťsx]
SFX U 0 ech [sx]
SFX U 0 y x
SFX U a e a
SFX U a ovi a
SFX U a em a
SFX U a ové a
SFX U a ů a
SFX U a ům a
SFX U a i a
SFX U a ích a
SFX U ď dě ď
SFX U ď di ď
SFX U ď děm ď
SFX U ď dích ď
SFX U ň ně [lL][eE]ň
SFX U ň ni [lL][eE]ň
SFX U ň něm [lL][eE]ň
SFX U 0 ů [lL][eE]ň
SFX U 0 ům [lL][eE]ň
SFX U ň ních [lL][eE]ň
SFX U eň ně [^lL]eň
SFX U eň ni [^lL]eň
SFX U eň něm [^lL]eň
SFX U eň ňů [^lL]eň
SFX U eň ňům [^lL]eň
SFX U eň ních [^lL]eň
SFX U ň ně [^eE]ň
SFX U ň ni [^eE]ň
SFX U ň něm [^eE]ň
SFX U 0 ů [^eE]ň
SFX U 0 ům [^eE]ň
SFX U ň ních [^eE]ň
SFX U ť tě ť
SFX U ť ti ť
SFX U ť těm ť
SFX U ť tích ť
SFX U e i e
SFX U 0 m e
SFX U e ů e
SFX U e ům e
SFX U e ích e

SFX D Y 102
SFX D es a es
SFX D es u es
SFX D es ovi es
SFX D es e [^ghkGHK]es
SFX D es em es
SFX D es ové es
SFX D es ů es
SFX D es ům es
SFX D es ech [^ighkIGHK]es
SFX D es y [^iI]es
SFX D es ích [iI]es
SFX D es ách [kK]es
SFX D es i [iI]es
SFX D és a és
SFX D és u és
SFX D és ovi és
SFX D és e [^ghkGHK]és
SFX D és em és
SFX D és ové és
SFX D és ů és
SFX D és ům és
SFX D és ech [^ighkIGHK]és
SFX D és y [^iI]és
SFX D és ích [iI]és
SFX D és ách [kK]és
SFX D és i [iI]és
SFX D os a os
SFX D os u os
SFX D os ovi os
SFX D os e [^ghkGHK]os
SFX D os em os
SFX D os ové os
SFX D os ů os
SFX D os ům os
SFX D os ech [^ighkIGHK]os
SFX D os y [^iI]os
SFX D os ích [iI]os
SFX D os ách [kK]os
SFX D os i [iI]os
SFX D us a us
SFX D us u us
SFX D us ovi us
SFX D us e [^ghkGHK]us
SFX D us em us
SFX D us ové us
SFX D us ů us
SFX D us ům us
SFX D us ech [^eikEIK]us
SFX D us y [^eiEI]us
SFX D us ích [eiEI]us
SFX D us ách [kK]us
SFX D us i [eiEI]us
SFX D as a as
SFX D as u as
SFX D as ovi as
SFX D as e [^ghkGHK]as
SFX D as em as
SFX D as ové as
SFX D as ů as
SFX D as ům as
SFX D as ech [^ighkIGHK]as
SFX D as y [^iI]as
SFX D as ích [iI]as
SFX D as ách [kK]as
SFX D as i [iI]as
SFX D s da [iI]s
SFX D s du [iI]s
SFX D s dovi [iI]s
SFX D s de [iI]s
SFX D s dem [iI]s
SFX D s dové [iI]s
SFX D s dů [iI]s
SFX D s dům [iI]s
SFX D s dy [iI]s
SFX D s dech [iI]s
SFX D 0 a [oO]n
SFX D 0 ta [oO]n
SFX D 0 u [oO]n
SFX D 0 tu [oO]n
SFX D 0 ovi [oO]n
SFX D 0 tovi [oO]n
SFX D 0 e [oO]n
SFX D 0 te [oO]n
SFX D 0 em [oO]n
SFX D 0 tem [oO]n
SFX D 0 é [^aeiouAEIOU]s
SFX D 0 é [^ansy]
SFX D a é a
SFX D 0 é [aA]n
SFX D ky ek [aeiouyáéíóúůýěAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚŮÝĚ][lrLR]ky
SFX D y 0 [^aeiouyáéíóúůýěAEIOUYÁÉÍÓÚŮÝĚ][lrLR][kK]y
SFX D ky ek [čdntvČDNTV]ky
SFX D y 0 [^čdntvrlČDNTVRL][kK]y
SFX D ly el [dkpzDKPZ]ly
SFX D y 0 [^dkpzDKPZ][lL]y
SFX D y 0 [^klKL]y
SFX D y ům y
SFX D y ách [ghGH]y
SFX D y ách [kK]y
SFX D y ách [rR]y
SFX D y ech [^ghkrGHKR]y
SFX D y ích [szSZ]y

SFX H Y 24
SFX H 0 u [^ey]
SFX H 0 e [^eyghkc]
SFX H 0 em [^ey]
SFX H 0 y [^ey]
SFX H 0 ů [^ey]
SFX H 0 ům [^ey]
SFX H 0 ech [^eyghk]
SFX H g zích g
SFX H h zích [^cC]h
SFX H ch ších ch
SFX H k cích k
SFX H e u e
SFX H 0 m e
SFX H e y e
SFX H e ů e
SFX H e ům e
SFX H e ech e
SFX H y ů y
SFX H y ům y
SFX H y ech [^ghkGHK]y
SFX H gy zích gy
SFX H hy zích [^cC]hy
SFX H chy ších chy
SFX H ky cích ky

SFX L Y 55
SFX L 0 a [^nk]
SFX L 0 u [^nk]
SFX L 0 e [^kn]
SFX L k ce [yY]k
SFX L 0 ě [bdfmptvw]
SFX L 0 em [^nk]
SFX L 0 y [^nk]
SFX L 0 ů [^nk]
SFX L 0 ům [^nk]
SFX L 0 ech [bdflmprtvz]
SFX L 0 ách [gh]
SFX L g zích g
SFX L h zích [^cC]h
SFX L ch ších ch
SFX L 0 ích [cčjřsšž]
SFX L ek ka ek
SFX L ek ku ek
SFX L ek kem ek
SFX L ek ky ek
SFX L ek ků ek
SFX L ek kům ek
SFX L ek cích ek
SFX L ek kách [íÍ][čČ]ek
SFX L 0 a [^eE]k
SFX L 0 u [^eE]k
SFX L 0 em [^eE]k
SFX L 0 y [^eE]k
SFX L 0 ů [^eE]k
SFX L 0 ům [^eE]k
SFX L k cích [^eE]k
SFX L 0 a [mM][eE]n
SFX L 0 u [mM][eE]n
SFX L 0 e [mM][eE]n
SFX L 0 em [mM][eE]n
SFX L 0 y [mM][eE]n
SFX L 0 ů [mM][eE]n
SFX L 0 ům [mM][eE]n
SFX L 0 ech [mM][eE]n
SFX L en na [^mM]en
SFX L en nu [^mM]en
SFX L en ne [^mM]en
SFX L en nem [^mM]en
SFX L en ny [^mM]en
SFX L en nů [^mM]en
SFX L en nům [^mM]en
SFX L en nech [^mM]en
SFX L 0 a [^eE]n
SFX L 0 u [^eE]n
SFX L 0 e [^eE]n
SFX L 0 ě [áéíýjÁÉÍÝJ]n
SFX L 0 em [^eE]n
SFX L 0 y [^eE]n
SFX L 0 ů [^eE]n
SFX L 0 ům [^eE]n
SFX L 0 ech [^eE]n

SFX S Y 60
SFX S 0 e [^aeíěcňťy]
SFX S 0 i [^aeíěcňťy]
SFX S 0 em [^aeíěcňťy]
SFX S 0 ů [^aeíěcňy]
SFX S 0 ům [^aeíěcňy]
SFX S 0 ích [^aeíěcňťnlszy]
SFX S 0 y n
SFX S 0 ech [nsz]
SFX S 0 ech [íÍ]l
SFX S 0 ích [^íÍ]l
SFX S ec ce ec
SFX S ec ci ec
SFX S ec cem ec
SFX S ec ců ec
SFX S ec cům ec
SFX S ec cích ec
SFX S 0 e [^eE]c
SFX S 0 i [^eE]c
SFX S 0 em [^eE]c
SFX S 0 ů [^eE]c
SFX S 0 ům [^eE]c
SFX S 0 ích [^eE]c
SFX S ť tě ť
SFX S ť ti ť
SFX S ť těm ť
SFX S ť tích ť
SFX S eň ně eň
SFX S eň ni eň
SFX S eň ňů eň
SFX S eň ňům eň
SFX S eň něm eň
SFX S eň ních eň
SFX S ň ně [^eE]ň
SFX S ň ni [^eE]ň
SFX S 0 ů [^eE]ň
SFX S 0 ům [^eE]ň
SFX S ň něm [^eE]ň
SFX S ň ních [^eE]ň
SFX S 0 m í
SFX S 0 ch í
SFX S 0 mi í
SFX S e i e
SFX S e í e
SFX S ě i ě
SFX S ě í ě
SFX S 0 ho y
SFX S 0 mu y
SFX S 0 m y
SFX S 0 ové y
SFX S 0 ovi y
SFX S a y [^cčďjňřšťžCČĎJŇŘŠŤŽ]a
SFX S a i [cčjřšžCČJŘŠŽ]a
SFX S ďa di ďa
SFX S ňa ni ňa
SFX S ťa ti ťa
SFX S ga ze ga
SFX S ka ce ka
SFX S a u a
SFX S a o a
SFX S a ou a
